Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Voluntary Dissolution

§ 17-20-1401.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-20-1402.
Dissolution by directors, members and third persons.

Unless this act, the articles, bylaws or the board of directors or members, acting pursuant to W.S. 17-19-1402(c) require a greater vote, dissolution is authorized if it is approved as provided by W.S. 17-19-1402(a)(i) and (iii) and by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of all of the members of the cooperative utility.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-20-140(a)(iii).

Articles 15 through 17. [Reserved]